Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska84-411
State Surveyor; entry upon property authorized; damages.

The State Surveyor and deputy surveyors in the official performance of their duties shall have authority to enter upon any property to make surveys. Entry upon any property, pursuant to this section, shall not be considered to be legal trespass and no damages shall be recoverable on that account alone. In case of any actual or demonstrable damages to the premises, the owner of the premises shall be paid an amount equal to the damages.

Laws 1982, LB 127, § 14.